Washington statutes.
RCW 35.95.080

Referendum rights not impaired.

Nothing contained in this chapter nor the provisions of any city charter shall prevent a referendum on any ordinance or action adopted or taken by any municipality under the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1965 ex.s. c 111 s 8.]